Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5145
Equipment.

An insurer may invest in equipment or interests in equipment wholly situated or maintained in the United States and Canada which are mortgaged or otherwise encumbered by the insurer as security for a nonrecourse debt and which are leased under a lease contract if:

(1) The annual lease payments to the lessor are sufficient to repay the full cost of the financing thereof within the unexpired term of the lease; and

(2) The lessee or ultimate guarantor of any lease securing the obligation is an entity the obligations of which are authorized investments under sections 44-5123 to 44-5131.

An insurer's investments authorized under this section shall not exceed five percent of its admitted assets.

Laws 1991, LB 237, § 45.